Illinois, session 104th, HB301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Benefit Corporation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 40/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Benefit Corporation Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-885, eff. 1-1-13.)